Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1913
X-ray system, defined.

X-ray system means an assemblage of components for the controlled production of X-rays, including, but not limited to, an X-ray high-voltage generator, an X-ray control, a tube housing assembly, a beam-limiting device, and the necessary supporting structures. Additional components which function with the system are considered integral parts of the system.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 651.